n11.dix
<pardef n="ma/gu_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>guvu</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>gu</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYu</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>guvannu</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYannu</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYiMxa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>guvigeV</l>
				<r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>guvigAgi</l>
				<r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>guvigoskara</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>akkalYigeV</l>
				<r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>akkalYigAgi</l>
				<r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>akkalYigoskara</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>guvina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>kkalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>guviniMxa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>akkalYiMxa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>guvina</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>kkalYa</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>guvinalli</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>makkalYalli</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>guve</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>kkalYe</l>
                <r>gu<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="piwq/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>vu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vigAgiV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>vigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgiV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>viniMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vina</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vinalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ve</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYe</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="magu"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/gu_n"/></e>
<e lm="piwq"><i>piwq</i><par n="piwq/_n"/></e>
<e lm="karwq"><i>karwq</i><par n="piwq/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwq"><i>mAwq</i><par n="piwq/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Srowq"><i>Srowq</i><par n="piwq/_n"/></e>
